Utah statutes.
48-2c-1501.   Purpose of Part 15.
This part shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose of making
available to professional persons the benefits of the limited liability
company form for the business aspects of their practices while preserving the
established professional relationships between the professional person and
those receiving the professional services.
